Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-603
Officers; canvass; certificates of election; failure to qualify, effect.

At a meeting of the council of a city of the second class, or the board of trustees of a village, on the first Monday after any city or village election, as the case may be, the returns, including returns for the election of members of the school board, shall be canvassed, and the city council or board of trustees, as the case may be, shall cause the municipal clerk to make out and deliver certificates of election, under the seal of the city or village, to the persons found to be elected. A neglect of any such elected officer to qualify within ten days after the delivery of such certificate shall be deemed a refusal to accept the office to which he or she may have been elected.

Laws 1879, § 62, p. 208;

R.S.1913, § 5145;

C.S.1922, § 4320;

C.S.1929, § 17-511;

R.S.1943, § 17-603;

Laws 1951, c. 35, § 1, p. 136;

Laws 1959, c. 60, § 56, p. 273;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 498.

Mandamus will compel canvassing board to declare the result of the election and issue certificate to successful parties. Moore v. Keck, 86 Neb. 694, 126 N.W. 388 (1910); Hotchkiss v. Keck, 86 Neb. 322, 125 N.W. 509 (1910).